test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-I-4-wâwi_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

   Lemma - wâwi :

      # Core

      # Nonposs
      wâwi+N+I+Sg: wâwi   #  an egg
      wâwi+N+I+Pl: wâwa   #  eggs
      wâwi+N+I+Loc: [wâwihk, wâwih]   #  in a egg


      # Poss
      wâwi+N+I+Px1Sg+Sg: niwâwim   #  my egg
      wâwi+N+I+Px3Sg+Sg: owâwim   #  his/her egg
      

      # Nonposs
      wâwi+N+I+Sg: wâwi   #  a egg
      wâwi+N+I+Pl: wâwa   #  eggs
      wâwi+N+I+Loc: [wâwihk, wâwih]   #  in a egg
      

      # Der/Dim
      wâwi+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Sg: [wâwis, wâwisîs]   #  a little egg
      

      # Poss # Sg
      wâwi+N+I+Px1Sg+Sg: niwâwim   #  my egg
      wâwi+N+I+Px2Sg+Sg: kiwâwim   #  your egg
      wâwi+N+I+Px3Sg+Sg: owâwim   #  his/her egg
      wâwi+N+I+Px1Pl+Sg: niwâwiminân   #  our egg
      wâwi+N+I+Px12Pl+Sg: kiwâwiminaw   #  your and our egg
      wâwi+N+I+Px2Pl+Sg: kiwâwimiwâw   #  your egg
      wâwi+N+I+Px3Pl+Sg: owâwimiwâw   #  their egg
      wâwi+N+I+Px4Sg/Pl+Sg: owâwimithiw   #  another's/others' egg
      

      # Poss # Pl
      wâwi+N+I+Px1Sg+Pl: niwâwima   #  my eggs
      wâwi+N+I+Px2Sg+Pl: kiwâwima   #  your eggs
      wâwi+N+I+Px3Sg+Pl: owâwima   #  his/her eggs
      wâwi+N+I+Px1Pl+Pl: niwâwiminâna   #  our eggs
      wâwi+N+I+Px12Pl+Pl: kiwâwiminawa   #  your and our eggs
      wâwi+N+I+Px2Pl+Pl: kiwâwimiwâwa   #  your eggs
      wâwi+N+I+Px3Pl+Pl: owâwimiwâwa   #  their eggs
      wâwi+N+I+Px4Sg/Pl+Pl: owâwimithiwa   #  another's/others' eggs
      

      # Poss # Loc
      wâwi+N+I+Px1Sg+Loc: [niwâwimihk, niwâwimih]   #  in my egg
      wâwi+N+I+Px2Sg+Loc: [kiwâwimihk, kiwâwimih]   #  in your egg
      wâwi+N+I+Px3Sg+Loc: [owâwimihk, owâwimih]   #  in his/her egg
      wâwi+N+I+Px1Pl+Loc: [niwâwiminâhk, niwâwiminâh]   #  in our egg
      wâwi+N+I+Px12Pl+Loc: [kiwâwiminâhk, kiwâwiminâh]   #  in your and our egg
      wâwi+N+I+Px2Pl+Loc: [kiwâwimiwâhk, kiwâwimiwâh]   #  in your egg
      wâwi+N+I+Px3Pl+Loc: [owâwimiwâhk, owâwimiwâh]   #  in their egg
      wâwi+N+I+Px4Sg/Pl+Loc: [owâwimithihk, owâwimithih]   #  in another's/others' egg
      
